test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_kaandas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kaandâš: # MLO, checked
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Nom:  kaandâš
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Gen:  kandii
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Acc:  kandii
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Ill:  kandâžân
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Loc:  kandiist
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Com:  kandijn
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Abe:  kandiittáá
    kaandâš+N+Ess:  kandâžin
    kaandâš+N+Par:  kandâžid
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Nom:  kandiih
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Gen:  kandij
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Acc:  kandijd
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Ill:  kandijd
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Loc:  kandijn
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Com:  [kandijguin, kandijgijn]
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Abe:  kandijttáá

  Noun - kuusâš: # MLO, checked
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Nom:  kuusâš
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Gen:  kussii
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Acc:  kussii
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Ill:  kusâžân
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Loc:  kussiist
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Com:  kussijn
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Abe:  kussiittáá
    kuusâš+N+Ess:  kusâžin
    kuusâš+N+Par:  kusâžid
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Nom:  kussiih
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Gen:  kussij
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Acc:  kussijd
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Ill:  kussijd
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Loc:  kussijn
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Com:  [kussijguin, kussijgijn]
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Abe:  kussijttáá
    
  Noun - kieđâš:
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Nom: kieđâš
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Gen: kieđii
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Acc: kieđii
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Ill: kieđâžân
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Loc: kieđiist
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Com: kieđijn
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Abe: kieđiittáá
    kieđâš+N+Ess: kieđâžin
    kieđâš+N+Par: kieđâžid
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Nom: kieđiih
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Gen: kieđij
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Acc: kieđijd
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Ill: kieđijd
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Loc: kieđijn
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Com: [kieđijguin, kieđijgijn]
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Abe: kieđijttáá

  Noun - mieđâš:
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Nom: mieđâš
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Gen: mieđii
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Acc: mieđii
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Ill: mieđâžân
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Loc: mieđiist
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Com: mieđijn
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Abe: mieđiittáá
    mieđâš+N+Ess: mieđâžin
    mieđâš+N+Par: mieđâžid
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Nom: mieđiih
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Gen: mieđij
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Acc: mieđijd
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Ill: mieđijd
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Loc: mieđijn
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Com: [mieđijguin, mieđijgijn]
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Abe: mieđijttáá

  Noun - oovtâš:
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Nom: oovtâš
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Gen: ovttii
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Acc: ovttii
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Ill: ovtâžân
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Loc: ovttiist
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Com: ovttijn
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Abe: ovttiittáá
    oovtâš+N+Ess: ovtâžin
    oovtâš+N+Par: ovtâžid
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Nom: ovttiih
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Gen: ovttij
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Acc: ovttijd
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Ill: ovttijd
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Loc: ovttijn
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Com: [ovttijguin, ovttijgijn]
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Abe: ovttijttáá
